Hawaii statutes.
[§286-102.5] Military Selective Service
Act; Selective Service System registration. (a) Qualified applicants for
a motor vehicle [driver's] license pursuant to section 286-107 or 286-108 or an
instruction permit pursuant to section 286-110 shall be registered with the
United States Selective Service System in compliance with Title 50 United
States Code Appendix section 453, as amended.

(b) Every qualified applicant identified in
subsection (a) shall be required to authorize the examiner of drivers to:

(1) Collect the necessary personal information
required for registering the qualified applicant with the United States
Selective Service System; and

(2) Electronically transmit the information to the
Selective Service System pursuant to subsection (d) for purposes of registering
the qualified applicant with the United States Selective Service System.

(c) The examiner of drivers shall notify all
qualified applicants identified in subsection (a) that by submitting an
application, the qualified applicant is consenting to registration with the
United States Selective Service System, if so required by federal law.

(d) The examiner of drivers shall collect from
a qualified applicant the necessary personal information required for
registering the qualified applicant with the United States Selective Service
System. The examiner of drivers shall transmit the necessary personal
information of the qualified applicant in an electronic format to the United
States Selective Service System to register the qualified applicant.

(e) For purposes of this section,
"qualified applicant" means male United States citizens and
immigrants at least eighteen years of age but less than twenty-six years of
age. [L 2001, c 86, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next